Maine, session 132, LD1611.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §17701-B, as amended by PL 2007, c. 491, §104, is further
amended to read:
§17701-B. Member contributions on and after July 1, 1993 2026
Notwithstanding sections 17701 and 17701‑A, on and or after July 1, 1993 July 1,
2026, all members shall contribute to the State Employee and Teacher Retirement Program
or have pick-up contributions made at a rate of 7.65% 6.2% of earnable compensation
except as otherwise provided in this Part.
Sec. 2. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026.